Louisiana, session 2026, HB295.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 20-B of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:1771 through 1778, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 20-B. GUIDELINES FOR USER AGE-VERIFICATION AND
RESPONSIBLE DIALOGUE ACT
§1771. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Guidelines for User
Age-Verification and Responsible Dialogue Act".
§1772. Purpose
The Legislature of Louisiana hereby finds that artificial intelligence chatbots
are increasingly being deployed on social media platforms and in consumer
applications used by minors. These chatbots have the potential to generate harmful
or sexually explicit content and can manipulate the emotional or behavioral
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-880 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 295
responses of children. The widespread availability of and exposure to these chatbots
may create risks of grooming, addiction, self-harm, violence, or other psychological
safety risks. Protecting minors from artificial intelligence chatbots that simulate
human interaction without accountability is a compelling governmental interest of
the state of Louisiana.
§1773. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Artificial intelligence chatbot" means an interactive computer service
or software application that produces adaptive or context-responsive content that is
not fully predetermined by a developer and accepts open-ended natural-language or
multimodal input. It does not include an interactive computer service or software
application that has limited responses to contextualized replies and that is unable to
respond on a range of topics outside of a narrow, specified purpose.
(2) "Artificial intelligence companion" means an artificial intelligence
chatbot that provides adaptive, human-like responses to users' inputs and is designed
to simulate interpersonal, emotional, therapeutic, or companionship interaction.
(3) "Covered entity" means any person or business that owns, operates, or
makes available an artificial intelligence chatbot to individuals located in this state.
(4) "Minor" means any individual under eighteen years of age.
(5) "Reasonable age-verification measure" means a reliable method of
determining whether a user is an adult, including government-issued identification
or any other comparable commercially reasonable verification technology.
Self-attestation or entry of a birth date alone shall not constitute reasonable
verification.
(6) "Reasonable age-verification process" means a process that uses one or
more reasonable verification measures applied to each user and not based solely on
shared technical identifiers.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-880 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 295
(7) "Sexually explicit conduct" means the depiction of sexual activity,
nudity, or sexually oriented language or the graphic depiction of sex, including but
not limited to sexual audio, text, or images.
§1774. Prohibitions
A. No person shall knowingly or with reckless disregard design, develop, or
deploy an artificial intelligence chatbot with the capabilities to do any of the
following:
(1) Solicit or induce a minor to engage in or simulate sexually explicit
conduct.
(2) Create or transmit visual depictions of sexually explicit conduct for a
minor.
(3) Encourage or coerce a minor to commit suicide, non-suicidal self-injury,
or imminent physical or sexual violence.
B. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be imprisoned for
not more than one year with or without hard labor, fined not more than one hundred
thousand dollars, or both.
§1775. Duties of covered entities; age verification
A. Covered entities shall do all of the following:
(1) Require the creation of a user account prior to interaction with an
artificial intelligence chatbot.
(2) Limit collection of personal data to what is minimally necessary to verify
the age of a user or maintain compliance with this Chapter.
(3) Prevent unauthorized access to age-verification data.
(4) Protect the integrity and confidentiality of age-verification data by only
transmitting such data using industry-standard encryption protocols.
(5) Prohibit the sale, transfer, or sharing of age-verification data.
(6) Retain verification data for no longer than is reasonably necessary to
verify the age of a user or maintain compliance with this Chapter.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-880 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 295
(7) Prohibit any user who is verified to be a minor from accessing or using
an artificial intelligence companion.
(8)(a) Employ reasonable age-verification processes through reasonable
age-verification measures as follows:
(i) Verify the age of new users before granting access and classify each user
as a minor or adult.
(ii) Verify the age of all existing users and freeze any account that has not
been verified for proof of age. In order to restore the functionality of a frozen
account, the covered entity shall require the user to provide age data that is verifiable
through a reasonable age-verification process.
(iii) Conduct periodic reviews of previously verified user accounts using a
reasonable age-verification process.
(b) A covered entity may contract with a third-party to employ reasonable
age-verification measures as part of the reasonable age-verification process, but
liability remains with the covered entity.
(9) Design, develop, or deploy artificial intelligence chatbots with all of the
following disclosures:
(a) At the start of each interaction and at thirty-minute intervals, that the
chatbot is an artificial intelligence system and not a human being.
(b) That the chatbot does not claim to be a human being or otherwise
respond deceptively when asked by a user if the chatbot is a human being.
(c) That the chatbot is not, nor directly or indirectly represents, that it is a
licensed professional nor claims to be a licensed professional. For purposes of this
Paragraph, "licensed professional" includes but is not limited to a therapist,
physician, lawyer, financial advisor, or other professional.
(c) That the chatbot does not provide medical, legal, financial, or
psychological advice and that users should consult licensed professionals for such
advice.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-880 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 295
§1776. Civil penalties
In addition to any criminal prosecution, whoever violates the provisions of
this Chapter may be assessed a civil fine of not more than one hundred thousand
dollars per violation, with each instance constituting a separate violation.
§1777. Enforcement
The office of the attorney general is authorized to do any of the following:
(1) Investigate violations of this Chapter.
(2) Issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and compel the production of
documents or testimony.
(3) Seek injunctive relief, restitution, and civil penalties.
(4) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions
of this Chapter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
§1778. Exemplary damages; attorney fees
Any party who is harmed by a violation of this Chapter may seek exemplary
damages, reasonable attorney fees, and reasonable costs in addition to any damages
available under Civil Code Article 2315.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act do not preempt any other state law that
provides greater protection to minors.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-880 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 295